District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-333.11

Imposition of fee for delivery of bad check in payment of obligation due District of Columbia; amount of fee; manner of collection; exception.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 28, 1965, 79 Stat. 844, Pub. L. 89-208, § 1
July 18, 1981, D.C. Law 4-16, § 2, 28 DCR 2365
Nov. 19, 1997, 111 Stat. 2186, Pub. L. 105-100,§ 157(b)
Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 1501, 44 DCR 7378
Oct, 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 1102, 52 DCR 7503
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9009, 58 DCR 6226
Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 1054(a), 59 DCR 8025

Cross References

Unemployment compensation, administrative expenses payments, see § 51-114.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 51-114.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-357.
1973 Ed., § 1-264.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-33, added subsec. (g).
D.C. Law 19-21, in subsec. (g), substituted “lapsing fund to be known as the Dishonored Check Fee Collection Fund (‘Fund’). Any monies deposited in the Fund shall be used exclusively for the purposes set forth in this section. Any unexpended funds in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year shall revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia” for “nonlapsing fund to be known as the Dishonored Check Fee Collection Fund (’Fund’); provided, that any funds deposited in the Fund in the year prior to a current year and the interest earned on that money remaining in the Fund after the payment of the costs accrued in the prior year, less 10% of the remainder amount that shall be retained as a reserve operating balance, shall be transferred or revert to the General Fund of the District of Columbia. All funds obtained from the fees authorized by this section, shall be deposited into the Fund and shall be used, subject to authorization by Congress in an appropriations act, to pay the costs of operating and maintaining the office or offices responsible for processing the fees authorized by this section.”

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 1501 of Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Temporary Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-59, March 20, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2094).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 1501 of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-152, October 17, 1997, 44 DCR 6196), and see § 1501 of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-239, January 13, 1998, 45 DCR 508).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1102 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 1054(a) of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-383, June 19, 2012, 59 DCR 7764).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 1054(a) of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).

Short Title

Short title of subtitle Q of title I of Law 16-33: Section 1101 of D.C. Law 16-33 provided that subtitle Q of title I of the act may be cited as the Dishonored Check Fee Collection Fund Establishment Act of 2005.

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 12-60: Section 2002 of D.C. Law 12-60 provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 1997.